North Dakota, session 69, HB1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 11-19.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. A report of death, an autopsy report, and any working papers, notes, images, pictures,
photographs, or recordings in any form are confidential but the coroner may use or disclose
these materials for purposes of an investigation, inquest, or prosecution, or inspection by the
department of corrections and rehabilitation. The coroner may disclose a copy of the report of
death in accordance with the authority of the state forensic examiner under section 23-01-05.5
and may disclose an autopsy photograph or other visual image or video or audio recording
subject to limitations in section 44-04-18.18. The coroner shall disclose a copy of the autopsy
report to the state forensic examiner.
SECTION 2. A new subdivision to subsection 4 of section 23-01-05.5 of the North Dakota Century
Code is created and enacted as follows:
To the department of corrections and rehabilitation if the decedent was an inmate in a
county, regional, or state correctional facility.

H. B. NO. 1116 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1116.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State